dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
opisati/AA
nikto/AC
tęžky/AD
veliky/AE
apelovati/AH
ambasada/AB
procitovati/AH
pisati/AA
inokto/AC
muzika/AB
kolonizovati/AH
inženjerstvo/AG
dųga/AB
limitovati/AH
pokušati/AF
lųka/AB
želězo/AG
sova/AB
filmovati/AH
vȯzdŕžati/AF
planeta/AB
člověčstvo/AG
planovati/AH
groza/AB
izvaljnjati/AF
učęstničstvo/AG
procedura/AB
konkurovati/AH
konfiskovati/AH
cegla/AB
zablokovati/AH
napisati/AA
iskra/AB
råzměšati/AF
protivdějstvo/AG
råbstvo/AG
podloga/AB
potvŕdati/AF
strahovati/AH
reforma/AB
komunikovati/AH
legenda/AB
stěna/AB
testovati/AH
postųpati/AF
měna/AB
kosovo/AG
remontovati/AH
tenky/AD
zaměna/AB
izbudovati/AH
hristijanstvo/AG
izběgati/AF
crkva/AB
vsekto/AC
vplyvati/AF
komora/AB
trěbovati/AH
privitati/AF
žila/AB
igla/AB
registrovati/AH
odpovědati/AF
česati/AA
koma/AB
srěbro/AG
rekonstruovati/AH
bezdna/AB
porno/AG
råzpušćati/AF
goŕky/AD
věra/AB
vlada/AB
hvatati/AF
gruda/AB
gravirovati/AH
mama/AB
metoda/AB
marširovati/AH
klasifikovati/AH
davati/AF
renesansa/AB
cělovati/AH
odděljati/AF
vizita/AB
zlåto/AG
podpisati/AA
požrtvovati/AH
posrědkovati/AH
opekati/AF
opeka/AB
zadovoljstvo/AG
imenovati/AH
čokolada/AB
prěpravjati/AF
jezda/AB
råbota/AB
udarjati/AF
usposabjati/AF
slåma/AB
trenovati/AH
analizovati/AH
krěpky/AD
někto/AC
poddavati/AF
egzistovati/AH
rada/AB
popivati/AF
sestrinstvo/AG
usilovati/AH
perspektiva/AB
hlåpstvo/AG
fotografovati/AH
językovědstvo/AG
odplaćati/AF
krajina/AB
odkųšati/AF
slovjanstvo/AG
krivověrstvo/AG
eksplodovati/AH
dětinstvo/AG
konstruovati/AH
medicina/AB
importovati/AH
nominovati/AH
manipulovati/AH
sěno/AG
evakuovati/AH
farba/AB
sųråbotničstvo/AG
sȯvětničstvo/AG
naměrjati/AF
obslugovati/AH
posrědničstvo/AG
guma/AB
okrųgljati/AF
protěkati/AF
sbudovati/AH
izježdati/AF
prěimenovati/AH
spisati/AA
zapisati/AA
prěpisati/AA
obdarjati/AF
prolamyvati/AF
råzmontovati/AH
obsluga/AB
izseljati/AF
spotrěbovati/AH
rųkovati/AH
råzočarovyvati/AF
nespokojstvo/AG
maroko/AG
děvičstvo/AG
nepovaga/AB
dopisyvati/AF
narodobijstvo/AG
rodobijstvo/AG
abonovati/AH
duhovenstvo/AG
vpisati/AA
demonstrovati/AH
odčityvati/AF
prědsědateljstvo/AG
gromada/AB
dopušćati/AF
dvorjanstvo/AG
entuziazmovati/AH
govędina/AB
grådanstvo/AG
izsylati/AF
jedinstvo/AG
klientstvo/AG
kovina/AB
kulminovati/AH
ljudstvo/AG
malenjky/AD
mlådečstvo/AG
naslědovati/AH
odsųtstvo/AG
oplakyvati/AF
slovjanizovati/AH
parola/AB
podkupovati/AH
podkupstvo/AG
pohvala/AB
pokladati/AF
prisųtstvo/AG
privykati/AF
programovati/AH
radničstvo/AG
rasa/AB
råbotničstvo/AG
rodstvo/AG
rybolovstvo/AG
skonfiskovati/AH
sȯučęstničstvo/AG
spokojstvo/AG
sųtrudničstvo/AG
spominati/AF
teplo/AG
uprava/AB
večerjati/AF
vinogrådstvo/AG
voditeljstvo/AG
vodstvo/AG
zapisati/AA
zautraka/AB
sdavati/AF
zdråvotničstvo/AG
sųharmonizovati/AH
jestvovati/AH
livada/AB
ljudobijstvo/AG
rěpa/AB
trimati/AF
zastava/AB
daunlodovati/AH
pisati/AA
kompjuterizovati/AH
ograničati/AF
infrastruktura/AB
zadŕživati/AF
preferovati/AH
zemjeděľstvo/AG
zaměšati/AF
azbuka/AB
harakterizovati/AH
skombinovati/AH
avtorstvo/AG
bogoslužba/AB
doba/AB
doživeti/AF
dvuženstvo/AG
gybky/AD
izrųbyvati/AF
jednobožstvo/AG
klima/AB
logovati/AH
ljudojedstvo/AG
mnogobožstvo/AG
nezadovaljati/AF
nuda/AB
opekunstvo/AG
oplodati/AF
popȯlzati/AF
prigybati/AF
pripisati/AA
rana/AB
råzkladati/AF
rokirovati/AH
slivati/AF
spolupracovati/AH
tvorčestvo/AG
uděljati/AF
ustrojstvo/AG
vȯzduhoplavstvo/AG
vȯzdvigati/AF
izgnanstvo/AG
žarky/AD
zelenina/AB
žužati/AF
legalizovati/AH
adoptovati/AH
formulovati/AH
jednoženstvo/AG
językoznavstvo/AG
korigovati/AH
odkazyvati/AF
profanovati/AH
provŕgati/AF
studiovati/AH
taktika/AB
domysljati/AF
měšćanstvo/AG
poråzuměti/AF
vnikati/AF
žirafa/AB
pripušćati/AF
izslědovati/AH
načrtati/AF
poprava/AB
prilětati/AF
pŕvorodstvo/AG
zaråbotyvati/AF
postųpati/AF
pritvorstvo/AG
proizvodstvo/AG
prěvladyvati/AF
sirota/AB
šarlatanstvo/AG
oznanjati/AF
zvězdoznavstvo/AG
obžerstvo/AG
lěpky/AD
klejky/AD
homogenizovati/AH
prědigra/AB
kuhaŕstvo/AG
masa/AB
pečętaŕstvo/AG
odtiskati/AF
vȯzimati/AF
abscisa/AB
abstrahovati/AH
aktivovati/AH
akušerstvo/AG
balzamovati/AH
barkarola/AB
brno/AG
deblokovati/AH
děvstvo/AG
dyhtěti/AF
formovati/AH
galera/AB
hyba/AB
idealizovati/AH
jarky/AD
ježina/AB
kotva/AB
kresati/AF
krěhky/AD
lososina/AB
lukavstvo/AG
mlězivo/AG
mŕtvečina/AB
nakydati/AF
neprijateljstvo/AG
oblamyvati/AF
odpisati/AA
odslanjati/AF
oslaběti/AF
ozdoba/AB
oznamenovati/AH
råzčesati/AA
råzgryzati/AF
råzščepjati/AF
ščetina/AB
tȯnky/AD
verbovati/AH
vikontesa/AB
interlingvistika/AB
izopačati/AF
rymovati/AH
lihvaŕstvo/AG
salata/AB
mųčeničstvo/AG
piratstvo/AG
akolada/AB
zažigati/AF
potomstvo/AG
flirtovati/AH
priučati/AF
limfa/AB
izmagateljstvo/AG
zagladati/AF
råzkovyvati/AF
amputovati/AH
izdavati/AF
spozdnjati/AF
slavistika/AB
brakonierstvo/AG
sortovati/AH
negybky/AD
potręsati/AF
zloradovati/AH
sųperničstvo/AG
šafa/AB
dokumentovati/AH
prědpisati/AA
simbolika/AB
diskreditovati/AH
limonada/AB
prědavstvo/AG
prisęgati/AF
nevtralizovati/AH
semantika/AB
deklamovati/AH
pčelaŕstvo/AG
loza/AB
tesati/AA
transkribovati/AH
zaščićati/AF
kapusta/AB
okolorovati/AH
prima/AB
dověrjati/AF
zaplanovati/AH
